Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.98.020

Prior investments or transactions not affected.

This title does not affect the legality of investments, made prior to January 5, 2015, or of transactions had before January 5, 2015, pursuant to any provisions of law in force when such investments were made or transactions had.

[ 2014 c 37 s 406.]